Massachusetts, session 194th, S1467.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition
is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following new subsection:-
(d) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall develop and
promulgate an appeals process to allow a municipality affected by the zoning provisions of this
section to seek relief from such provisions based on one or more of the following:
1. The inability to meet the drinking water supply requirements necessary to support the
housing units authorized by such provisions
2. The inability to meet the wastewater treatment requirements necessary to support such
units
3. The inability of municipal transportation infrastructure to safely accommodate
increased population attributable to housing development pursuant to such provisions
of 2

4. Any adverse environmental impacts attributable to the developments of housing units
pursuant to such provisions.
5. Any adverse impacts on historical properties.
of 2